Massachusetts, session 194th, S1509.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 270 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 27 the following section:-  
"Section 28. No food delivery provider operating within the Commonwealth shall use 
staples in order to seal bags or containers carrying raw or prepared foods or beverages."  
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage."